Connecticut, session 2026, HB05489.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) There is established a working group
to study the state's Workers' Compensation Act. Such study shall
include, but not be limited to, a review of provisions set forth in sections
31-275 to 31-355b, inclusive, of the general statutes for the purpose of
recommending needed changes to such provisions of the general
statutes. The working group shall consist of the following members,
who have familiarity with and expertise in the application and
interpretation of the state's Workers' Compensation Act: (1) One
appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives; (2) one
appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate; (3) one appointed
by the majority leader of the House of Representatives; (4) one
appointed by the majority leader of the Senate; (5) one appointed by the
minority leader of the House of Representatives; and (6) one appointed
by the minority leader of the Senate. Not later than January 1, 2027, the
working group shall submit a report on its findings and
recommendations to the joint standing committees of the General
LCO No. 2707 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 5489
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to the judiciary and
labor, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general
statutes. The working group shall terminate on the date that it submits
such report or January 1, 2027, whichever is later.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section